Utah statutes.
36-16a-104.   Election official duties.

Each election official shall comply with:

(1)  the requirements of Title 20A, Election Code, relating to regular general elections;

(2)  the requirements of Section 36-16a-106; and

(3)  any other requirement imposed by the lieutenant governor.

